Ohio, session 136, HB985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 303.12, 504.14, 519.12, and 731.29 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 303.12. (A)(1) Amendments to the zoning resolution may be initiated by motion of the county rural zoning commission, by the passage of a resolution by the board of county commissioners, or by the filing of an application by one or more of the owners or lessees of property within the area proposed to be changed or affected by the proposed amendment with the county rural zoning commission. The board of county commissioners may require that the owner or lessee of property filing an application to amend the zoning resolution pay a fee to defray the cost of advertising, mailing, filing with the county recorder, and other expenses. If the board of county commissioners requires such a fee, it shall be required generally, for each application. The board of county commissioners, upon the passage of such a resolution, shall certify it to the county rural zoning commission. (2) Upon the adoption of a motion by the county rural zoning commission, the certification of a resolution by the board of county commissioners to the commission, or the filing of an application by property owners or lessees as described in division (A)(1) of this section with the commission, the commission shall set a date for a public hearing, which date shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the date of adoption of such a motion, the date of the certification of such a resolution, or the date of the filing of such an application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the commission by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing, using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in each township affected by the proposed amendment; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the county. (B) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land, as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, written notice of the hearing shall be mailed by the county rural zoning commission, by first class mail, at least ten days before the date of the public hearing to all owners of property within and contiguous to and directly across the street from the area proposed to be rezoned or redistricted to the addresses of those owners appearing on the county auditor's current tax list. The failure of delivery of that notice shall not invalidate any such amendment. (C) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published and mailed notices shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, resolution, or application is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of these properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, resolution, or application proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the public hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of county commissioners for its action; (8) Any other information requested by the commission. (D) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of county commissioners for its action; (6) Any other information requested by the commission. Hearings shall be held in the county court house or in a public place designated by the commission. (E) Within five days after the adoption of the motion described in division (A) of this section, the certification of the resolution described in division (A) of this section, or the filing of the application described in division (A) of this section, the county rural zoning commission shall transmit a copy of it together with text and map pertaining to it to the county or regional planning commission, if there is such a commission. The county or regional planning commission shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment or the approval of some modification of it and shall submit its recommendation to the county rural zoning commission. The recommendation shall be considered at the public hearing held by the county rural zoning commission on the proposed amendment. The county rural zoning commission, within thirty days after the hearing, shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment, or the approval of some modification of it, and shall submit that recommendation together with the motion, application, or resolution involved, the text and map pertaining to the proposed amendment, and the recommendation of the county or regional planning commission on it to the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners, upon receipt of that recommendation, shall set a time for a public hearing on the proposed amendment, which date shall be not more than thirty days from the date of the receipt of that recommendation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the board by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing, using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the county. (F) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of county commissioners that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, application, or resolution proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) Any other information requested by the board. (G) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of county commissioners that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) Any other information requested by the board. (H) Within twenty days after its public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall either adopt or deny the recommendation of the county rural zoning commission or adopt some modification of it. If the board denies or modifies the commission's recommendation, a majority vote of the board shall be required. Except as provided in division (I) of this section, the proposed amendment, if adopted by the board, shall become effective in thirty days after the date of its adoption, unless, within thirty days after the adoption, there is presented to the board of county commissioners a petition, signed by a number of qualified voters residing in the unincorporated area of the township or part of that unincorporated area included in the zoning plan equal to not less than eight per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board to submit the amendment to the electors of that area for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election occurring at least ninety days after the petition is submitted. Each part of this petition shall contain the number and the full and correct title, if any, of the zoning amendment resolution, motion, or application, furnishing the name by which the amendment is known and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to meeting the requirements of this section, each petition shall be governed by the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The form of a petition calling for a zoning referendum and the statement of the circulator shall be substantially as follows: "PETITION FOR ZONING REFERENDUM (if the proposal is identified by a particular name or number, or both, these should be inserted here) ________________________ A proposal to amend the zoning map of the unincorporated area of ______________ Township, ___________________ County, Ohio, adopted _______ (date) __________ (followed by brief summary of the proposal). To the Board of County Commissioners of __________________ County, Ohio: We, the undersigned, being electors residing in the unincorporated area of _______________ Township, included within the _________________ County Zoning Plan, equal to not less than eight per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the preceding general election at which a governor was elected, request the Board of County Commissioners to submit this amendment of the zoning resolution to the electors of _____________ Township residing within the unincorporated area of the township included in the _______________ County Zoning Resolution, for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election to be held on ________(date)_______, pursuant to section 303.12 of the Revised Code. Street Address Date of Signature or R.F.D. Township Precinct County Signing _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR I, _____________________(name of circulator)___________________, declare under penalty of election falsification that I am an elector of the state of Ohio and reside at the address appearing below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing part petition containing _____(number)_______ signatures; that I have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) _____________________________ - (Address of circulator's - permanent residence in this - state) _____________________________ (City, village, or township, - and zip code) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." No amendment for which such a referendum vote has been requested shall be put into effect unless a majority of the vote cast on the issue is in favor of the amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that the amendment has been approved by the voters, it shall take immediate effect. Within five working days after an amendment's effective date, the board of county commissioners shall file the text and maps of the amendment in the office of the county recorder and with the regional or county planning commission, if one exists. The failure to file any amendment, or any text and maps, or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the county recorder or the county or regional planning commission as required by this section does not invalidate the amendment and is not grounds for an appeal of any decision of the board of zoning appeals. (I) If a proposed amendment establishes or modifies planned-unit development regulations, the following apply in lieu of the contrary provisions of division (H) of this section: (1) The petition shall be signed by a number of registered electors residing in the territory where the planned-unit development regulations apply or will apply equal to not less than thirty-five twenty per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that territory at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected. (2) The form of the petition required under division (H) of this section shall specify the thirty-five twenty per cent figure in lieu of the eight per cent figure. (3) The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of the petition not later than thirty days after the petition is certified to the board of elections by the board of county commissioners. (4) If the board of elections determines there is an insufficient number of valid signatures, the board immediately shall notify the person who presented the petition. The person may submit additional signatures not later than ten days after the notification. Sec. 504.14. In a township that adopts a limited home rule government, resolutions may be proposed by initiative petition by the electors in the unincorporated area of the township and adopted by election by these electors, and resolutions adopted by the board of township trustees may be submitted to these electors for their approval or rejection by referendum, under the same circumstances and in the same manner as provided by sections 731.28 to 731.40 of the Revised Code for municipal corporations, except that both of the following apply: (A) Initiative and referendum petitions shall be filed with the township fiscal officer, who shall perform the duties imposed under those sections upon the city auditor or village clerk. (B) Initiative and referendum petitions shall contain the signatures of not less than thirty-five twenty per cent of the total number of electors in the unincorporated area of the township who voted for the office of governor at the most recent general election for that office in that area of the township. Sec. 519.12. (A)(1) Amendments to the zoning resolution may be initiated by motion of the township zoning commission, by the passage of a resolution by the board of township trustees, or by the filing of an application by one or more of the owners or lessees of property within the area proposed to be changed or affected by the proposed amendment with the township zoning commission. The board of township trustees may require that the owner or lessee of property filing an application to amend the zoning resolution pay a fee to defray the cost of advertising, mailing, filing with the county recorder, and other expenses. If the board of township trustees requires such a fee, it shall be required generally, for each application. The board of township trustees, upon the passage of such a resolution, shall certify it to the township zoning commission. (2) Upon the adoption of a motion by the township zoning commission, the certification of a resolution by the board of township trustees to the commission, or the filing of an application by property owners or lessees as described in division (A)(1) of this section with the commission, the commission shall set a date for a public hearing, which date shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the date of the certification of such a resolution, the date of adoption of such a motion, or the date of the filing of such an application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the commission by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the township; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the township. (B) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land, as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, written notice of the hearing shall be mailed by the township zoning commission, by first class mail, at least ten days before the date of the public hearing to all owners of property within and contiguous to and directly across the street from the area proposed to be rezoned or redistricted to the addresses of those owners appearing on the county auditor's current tax list. The failure of delivery of that notice shall not invalidate any such amendment. (C) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published and mailed notices shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the township zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, resolution, or application is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, resolution, or application proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of township trustees for its action; (8) Any other information requested by the commission. (D) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the township zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of township trustees for its action; (6) Any other information requested by the commission. (E)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (E)(1)(b) of this section, within five days after the adoption of the motion described in division (A) of this section, the certification of the resolution described in division (A) of this section, or the filing of the application described in division (A) of this section, the township zoning commission shall transmit a copy of it together with text and map pertaining to it to the county or regional planning commission, if there is such a commission, for approval, disapproval, or suggestions. The county or regional planning commission shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment or the approval of some modification of it and shall submit its recommendation to the township zoning commission. The recommendation shall be considered at the public hearing held by the township zoning commission on the proposed amendment. (b) The township zoning commission of a township that has adopted a limited home rule government under Chapter 504. of the Revised Code is not subject to division (E)(1)(a) of this section but may choose to comply with division (E)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The township zoning commission, within thirty days after the hearing, shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment, or the approval of some modification of it, and submit that recommendation together with the motion, application, or resolution involved, the text and map pertaining to the proposed amendment, and the recommendation of the county or regional planning commission on it to the board of township trustees. (3) The board of township trustees, upon receipt of that recommendation, shall set a time for a public hearing on the proposed amendment, which date shall not be more than thirty days from the date of the receipt of that recommendation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the board by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the township; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the township. (F) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of township trustees that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, application, or resolution proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) Any other information requested by the board. (G) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of township trustees that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) Any other information requested by the board. (H) Within twenty days after its public hearing, the board of township trustees shall either adopt or deny the recommendations of the township zoning commission or adopt some modification of them. If the board denies or modifies the commission's recommendations, a majority vote of the board shall be required. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, the proposed amendment, if adopted by the board, shall become effective in thirty days after the date of its adoption, unless, within thirty days after the adoption, there is presented to the board of township trustees a petition, signed by a number of registered electors residing in the unincorporated area of the township or part of that unincorporated area included in the zoning plan equal to not less than thirty-five twenty per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board of township trustees to submit the amendment to the electors of that area for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election that occurs at least ninety days after the petition is filed. Each part of this petition shall contain the number and the full and correct title, if any, of the zoning amendment resolution, motion, or application, furnishing the name by which the amendment is known and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to meeting the requirements of this section, each petition shall be governed by the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The form of a petition calling for a zoning referendum and the statement of the circulator shall be substantially as follows: "PETITION FOR ZONING REFERENDUM (if the proposal is identified by a particular name or number, or both, these should be inserted here) _______________________ A proposal to amend the zoning map of the unincorporated area of _____________ Township, _________________ County, Ohio, adopted _____(date)_____ (followed by brief summary of the proposal). To the Board of Township Trustees of _____________________ Township, _________________ County, Ohio: We, the undersigned, being electors residing in the unincorporated area of _______________________ Township, included within the _____________ Township Zoning Plan, equal to not less than thirty-five twenty per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the preceding general election at which a governor was elected, request the Board of Township Trustees to submit this amendment of the zoning resolution to the electors of ________________________ Township residing within the unincorporated area of the township included in the __________________ Township Zoning Resolution, for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the primary or general election to be held on _____(date)_____, pursuant to section 519.12 of the Revised Code. Street Address Date of Signature or R.F.D. Township Precinct County Signing __________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR I, _____________(name of circulator)__________, declare under penalty of election falsification that I am an elector of the state of Ohio and reside at the address appearing below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing part petition containing _______(number)_______ signatures; that I have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. ___________________________________ (Signature of circulator) ___________________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) ___________________________________ (City, village, or township, and zip code) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The petition shall be filed with the board of township trustees and shall be accompanied by an appropriate map of the area affected by the zoning proposal. Within two weeks after receiving a petition filed under this section, the board of township trustees shall certify the petition to the board of elections. A petition filed under this section shall be certified to the board of elections not less than ninety days prior to the election at which the question is to be voted upon. The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of each petition certified to it by a board of township trustees under this section. If the board of elections determines that a petition is sufficient and valid, the question shall be voted upon at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election that occurs at least ninety days after the date the petition is filed with the board of township trustees, regardless of whether any election will be held to nominate or elect candidates on that day. No amendment for which such a referendum vote has been requested shall be put into effect unless a majority of the vote cast on the issue is in favor of the amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that the amendment has been approved by the voters, it shall take immediate effect. (I) Within five working days after an amendment's effective date, the board of township trustees shall file the text and maps of the amendment in the office of the county recorder and with the county or regional planning commission, if one exists. The failure to file any amendment, or any text and maps, or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the county recorder or the county or regional planning commission as required by this section does not invalidate the amendment and is not grounds for an appeal of any decision of the board of zoning appeals. (J)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code, a decision of the board of township trustees to adopt a proposed amendment to the zoning text or map to rezone, redistrict, or otherwise make an amendment related to, any property involved in a megaproject as defined in section 122.17 of the Revised Code shall take effect immediately upon adoption and is exempt from the referendum procedures in division (H) of this section. (2) If a proposed amendment establishes or modifies planned-unit development regulations, the following apply in lieu of the contrary provisions of division (H) of this section: (a) The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of the petition not later than thirty days after the petition is certified to the board of elections by the board of township trustees. (b) If the board of elections determines there is an insufficient number of valid signatures, the board immediately shall notify the person who presented the petition. The person may submit additional signatures not later than ten days after the notification. Sec. 731.29. Any ordinance or other measure passed by the legislative authority of a municipal corporation shall be subject to the referendum except as provided by section 731.30 of the Revised Code. No ordinance or other measure shall go into effect until thirty days after it is filed with the mayor of a city or passed by the legislative authority in a village, except as provided by such section. Except as provided in section 731.291 of the Revised Code, when a petition, signed by thirty-five twenty per cent of the number of electors who voted for governor at the most recent general election for the office of governor in the municipal corporation, is filed with the city auditor or village clerk within thirty days after any ordinance or other measure is filed with the mayor or passed by the legislative authority of a village, or in case the mayor has vetoed the ordinance or any measure and returned it to council, such petition may be filed within thirty days after the council has passed the ordinance or measure over the veto, ordering that such ordinance or measure be submitted to the electors of such municipal corporation for their approval or rejection, such auditor or clerk shall, after ten days, and not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of election, transmit a certified copy of the text of the ordinance or measure to the board of elections. The auditor or clerk shall transmit the petition to the board together with the certified copy of the ordinance or measure. The board shall examine all signatures on the petition to determine the number of electors of the municipal corporation who signed the petition. The board shall return the petition to the auditor or clerk within ten days after receiving it, together with a statement attesting to the number of such electors who signed the petition. The board shall submit the ordinance or measure to the electors of the municipal corporation, for their approval or rejection, at the next general election occurring subsequent to ninety days after the auditor or clerk certifies the sufficiency and validity of the petition to the board of elections. No such ordinance or measure shall go into effect until approved by the majority of those voting upon it. Sections 731.28 to 731.41 of the Revised Code do not prevent a municipal corporation, after the passage of any ordinance or other measure, from proceeding at once to give any notice or make any publication required by such ordinance or other measure. As used in this section, "certified copy" means a copy containing a written statement attesting that it is a true and exact reproduction of the original ordinance or other measure. Section 2. That existing sections 303.12, 504.14, 519.12, and 731.29 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The changes to petition signature requirements in sections 303.12, 504.14, 519.12, and 731.29 of the Revised Code as amended by this act apply to petitions filed on or after the effective date of this section.